Mississippi, session 2026, HB1478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1) The Division of Medicaid shall implement and administer the Medicaid eligibility reporting program under this section. (2)  The division may (a) enter into contracts and interagency agreements, (b) adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, (c) adopt fee schedules, and (d) apply for and implement waivers and managed care plans for services for eligible recipients, including services under Section 43-13-117. (3)  The division shall maintain the confidentiality of information regarding applicants for or recipients of Medicaid and such information shall only be used for purposes related to administration of the Medicaid program and the provision of such assistance or as otherwise permitted by federal law. (4)  The division shall prepare an annual summary and analysis of the Medicaid program for legislative and public review.  The division shall submit a report of such summary and analysis to the Governor and the Legislature electronically no later than December 1 of each year.  The annual summary shall include, but not be limited to: (a)  The number and percentage of applications approved and denied; (b)  The number of eligibility determinations, including the number and percentage of those individuals remaining enrolled, terminations, and other determinations; (c)  The number of case closures in the Medicaid program and the Children's Health Insurance Program and the specific reason for the closure broken down by (i) eligibility category, including program type, (ii) local public health district or other geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available; (d)  The number of Medicaid program and Children's Health Insurance Program enrollees broken down by (i) eligibility category, including program type, (ii) local public health district or other geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available; (e)  The number and percentage of redeterminations or renewals processed ex parte, broken down by (i) eligibility category, including program type and (ii) race or ethnicity, if available; (f)  The average number of days required to process applications for the Medicaid program and Children's Health Insurance Program, separating the data by applicants with modified adjusted gross income and nonmodified adjusted gross income eligibility; (g)  The rate of re-enrollment within ninety (90) days of termination and within twelve (12) months of termination, broken down by (i) eligibility category, including program type, (ii) local public health district or other geographic area, and (iii) race or ethnicity, if available; (h)  The average client call duration; (i)  The client call abandonment rate; (j)  The number of requests for a fair hearing separated by (i) eligibility category and program type, (ii) outcome, and (iii) amount of time until final disposition. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.